District of Columbia statutes.
50-510

Suspension of enforcement.

Notwithstanding any other provision of District law, enforcement of this chapter by the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs is suspended until October 1, 2000.

Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-162, § 11a
as added Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 811, 42 DCR 3684
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1402, 45 DCR 7193

History

Security interests, enforceability, see §§ 28:9-203 and 28:9-302.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 40-1310.

Prior Codifications

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 807 of Multiyear Budget Spending Reduction and Support Temporary Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 10-253, March 23, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 1652).

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary addition of section, see § 811 of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 1002 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).

Emergency Legislation